California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(d) A direct care staff person who does not comply with this section may not continue to provide direct care to consumers in a licensed community care facility that receives regional center funding, unless otherwise approved by the department pursuant to conditions for a waiver specified in regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (e).

(e) The department shall adopt emergency regulations in order to implement this section. These regulations may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Requirements for satisfactory completion of the 70 hours of direct care staff training.

(2) Provisions for enforcement of training requirements.

(3) Continuing education requirements beyond the initial 70 hours of required training.

(4) Provisions for waiving staff training and competency testing requirements, provided that waivers shall not adversely impact the health and safety of consumers living in licensed community care facilities that receive regional center funding.

(f) The emergency regulations adopted by the department pursuant to subdivision (e) shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The initial adoption of emergency regulations and one readoption of the initial regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. Initial
 emergency regulations and the first readoption of those regulations shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and publication in the California Code of Regulations and shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 320.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Regional Center Clients Requiring Mental Health Services [4696. - 4697.]

4696.

The Legislature places a high priority on ensuring that regional center clients and their families can avail themselves of mental health services which are appropriate to meet their needs. The purpose of this article is to determine methods of identifying these clients as well as the type and extent of services which should be available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 36, Sec. 1.   Effective March 31, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

4696.1.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that improved cooperative efforts between regional centers and county mental health agencies are necessary in order to achieve each of the following:

(1) Increased leadership, communication, and organizational effectiveness between regional centers and county mental health agencies.

(2) Decreased costs and minimized fiscal risk in serving persons who are dually diagnosed with mental illness and developmental disabilities.

(3) Continuity of services.

(4) Improved quality of mental health
 outcomes for persons who are dually diagnosed.

(5) Optimized utilization of agency resources by building on the strengths of each organization.

(6) Timely resolution of conflicts.

(b) In order to achieve the outcomes specified in subdivision (a), by July 1, 1999, each regional center and county mental health agency shall develop a memorandum of understanding to do all of the following:

(1) Identify staff who will be responsible for all of the following:

(A) Coordinate service activity between the two agencies.

(B) Identify dually diagnosed consumers of mutual concern.

(C) Conduct problem resolution for those consumers serviced by both systems.

(2) Develop a general plan for crisis intervention for persons served by both systems. The plan shall include after-hours emergency response systems, interagency notification guidelines, and followup protocols.

(3) Develop a procedure by which each dually diagnosed consumer shall be the subject of a case conference conducted jointly by both regional center staff and county mental health as soon as possible after admission into a county operated or contracted acute, inpatient mental health facility. The case conference shall confirm the diagnosis and the treatment plan.

(4) Develop a procedure by which planning for dually diagnosed consumers admitted to a mental health inpatient facility shall be conducted collaboratively by both
 the regional center and the local mental health agency and shall commence as soon as possible or as deemed appropriate by the treatment staff. The discharge plan shall include subsequent treatment needs and the agency responsible for those services.

(5) Develop a procedure by which regional center staff and county mental health staff shall collaborate to plan and provide training to community service providers, including day programs, residential facilities, and intermediate care facilities, regarding effective services to persons who are dually diagnosed. This training shall include crisis prevention with a focus on proactively recognizing crisis and intervening effectively with consumers who are dually diagnosed.

(6) Develop a procedure by which the regional center and the county mental health agency shall work toward agreement on a consumer-by-consumer basis on the presenting
 diagnosis and medical necessity, as defined by regulations of the State Department of Health Care Services.

(c) The department and the State Department of Health
 Care Services shall collaborate to provide a statewide perspective and technical assistance to local service regions when local problem resolution mechanisms have been exhausted and state level participation has been requested by both local agencies.

(d) The director of the local regional center and the director of the county mental health agency or their designees shall meet as needed but no less than annually to do all of the following:

(1) Review the effectiveness of the interagency collaboration.

(2) Address any outstanding policy issues between the two agencies.

(3) Establish the direction and priorities for ongoing collaboration efforts between the two agencies.

(e) Copies of each memorandum of understanding shall be forwarded to the State Department of Developmental Services upon completion or whenever amended. The department shall make copies of the memorandum of understanding available to the public upon request.

(f) By May 15 of each year, the department shall provide all of the following information to the Legislature:

(1) The status of the memorandums of understanding developed jointly by each regional center and the county mental health agency and identify any barriers to meeting the outcomes specified in this section.

(2) The availability of mobile crisis intervention services, including generic services, by regional center catchment area, including the names of vendors and rates paid.

(3) A description of each regional center’s funded emergency housing options, including the names and types of vendors, the number of beds and rates, including, but not limited to, crisis emergency group homes, crisis beds in a regular group home, crisis foster homes, motel or hotel or psychiatric facility beds, and whether each emergency housing option serves minors or adults and whether it is physically accessible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 76.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4696.3.

A regional center shall notify the clients’ rights advocate, as described in Section 4433, of all consumers placed on an involuntary psychiatric hold or in a Lanterman-Petris-Short conservatorship pursuant to Section 5250, 5260, 5270.10, 5300, or 5350.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 28, Sec. 29.   (SB 81)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4697.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The methods of establishing rates of payment for providers of services and supports to persons with developmental disabilities in the community should reflect the actual costs of ensuring high quality and stable services.

(2) State law and regulations should reflect the type and design of community-based services and supports necessary to best meet the needs and choices of individuals with developmental disabilities and their families.

(3) The licensing, vendoring, and monitoring of service and support providers is necessary to ensure the safety and satisfaction of consumers and should be achieved in a manner that is respectful of consumer privacy and choices, responsive to consumers and families, minimizes complexity and duplication, fosters partnership between state agencies and regional centers and provider in the delivery of high-quality services and supports, and respond swiftly to protect the rights and health of consumers.

(4) System stakeholders must work collaboratively and continuously to ensure that the design, funding methodology, and monitoring of the service and support delivery system reflects the values and goals of those served.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Department of Developmental Services facilitate joint meetings between system stakeholders, as appropriate, to review the service delivery system and make recommendations for change when desirable. The efforts may include, but are not limited to:

(1) The process by which regional centers vendor providers of services and supports and make recommendations for changes to improve the quality of services and supports and choices of consumers and families in selecting providers.

(2) Ratesetting methodologies and recommendations to maximize cost-effectiveness while emphasizing quality, variety, and flexibility in the delivery of services and supports.

(3) The various monitoring and oversight functions of state and local agencies and recommendations for improving effectiveness and minimizing duplication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1043, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Community Crisis Home Certification [4698. - 4698.1.]

4698.

(a) (1) “Community crisis home” means a facility certified by the State Department of Developmental Services pursuant to this article, and licensed by the State Department of Social Services, pursuant to Article 9.7 (commencing with Section 1567.80) of Chapter 3 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, as an adult residential facility or a group home providing 24-hour nonmedical care to individuals with developmental disabilities receiving regional center services and in need of crisis intervention services who would otherwise be at risk of admission to a State Department of Developmental Services-operated facility, an out-of-state
 placement, a general acute hospital, an acute psychiatric hospital, or an institution for mental disease, as described in Part 5 (commencing with Section 5900) of Division 5. A community crisis home shall have a maximum capacity of eight consumers. No more than one-third of community crisis homes may exceed a capacity of six consumers.

(2) “Consumer,” “client,” or “individual” means
 a person who has been determined by a regional center to meet the eligibility criteria of Section 4512 and applicable regulations and for whom the regional center has accepted responsibility.

(b) (1) The State Department of Developmental Services, using community resource development plan funds, shall establish community-based residential options consisting of community crisis homes for adults and community crisis homes for children. The community crisis homes shall serve individuals who meet all of the following criteria:

(A) The child or adult has one or more developmental disabilities.

(B) The child or adult receives regional center services.

(C) The child or adult requires crisis intervention services.

(D) The child or adult would otherwise be at risk of admission to a State Department of Developmental Services-operated facility, an out-of-state placement, a general acute hospital, an acute psychiatric hospital, or an institution for mental disease, as described in Part 5 (commencing with Section 5900) of Division 5.

(2) The State Department of Developmental Services may issue a certificate of program approval to a community crisis home qualified pursuant to this
 article.

(3) A community crisis home using delayed egress devices may utilize secured perimeters in compliance with Section 1531.15 of the Health and Safety Code and applicable regulations. The total number of community crisis beds using delayed egress devices in combination with secured perimeters shall not exceed 20 percent of the statewide limit established in subdivision (k) of Section 1531.15 of the Health and Safety Code. A community crisis home that uses delayed egress devices in combination with secured perimeters shall not have more than six beds.

(c) A community crisis home shall not be licensed by the State Department of Social Services until the certificate of program approval, issued pursuant to this article by the State Department of Developmental Services, has been received.

(1) A community crisis home
 shall be certified only if approved through a regional center community placement plan pursuant to
 former Section 4418.25, as that section read on June 30, 2026, or a regional center community resource development plan pursuant to Section 4418.25. Each home shall conform to Section 441.530(a)(1) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The home shall be eligible for federal Medicaid home- and community-based services funding, unless the State Department of Developmental Services approves the use of delayed egress devices with secured perimeters to be utilized at the community crisis home pursuant to Section 1531.15 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) A consumer shall not be placed in a community crisis home unless the program is certified by the State Department of Developmental Services,
 pursuant to this article, and the facility is licensed by the State Department of Social Services, pursuant to Article 9.7 (commencing with Section 1567.80) of Chapter 3 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) A certificate of program approval, issued pursuant to this article by the State Department of Developmental Services, shall be a condition of licensure for the community crisis home by the State Department of Social Services, pursuant to Article 9.7 (commencing with Section 1567.80) of Chapter 3 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) Community crisis homes shall exceed the minimum requirements for a Residential Facility Service Level 4I pursuant to Sections 56004 and 56013 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, and shall meet all applicable statutory and regulatory requirements for facility licensing, the use of behavior modification
 interventions, and seclusion and restraint, including Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 1180) of the Health and Safety Code, and that are applicable to facilities licensed as adult residential facilities.

(d) Community crisis homes shall have a facility program plan approved by the State Department of Developmental Services. The facility program plan approved by the State Department of Developmental Services shall be submitted to the State Department of Social Services for inclusion in the facility plan of operation, pursuant to Section 1567.84 of the Health and Safety Code.

(1) No later than March 1, 2020, the department shall develop guidelines regarding the use of restraint or containment in community crisis homes, which shall be maintained in the facility program plan and plan of operation. In the development of these guidelines, the department shall consult with both of
 the following:

(A) The appropriate professionals regarding the use of restraint or containment in community crisis homes.

(B) The protection and advocacy agency described in subdivision (i) of Section 4900 regarding appropriate safeguards for the protection of clients’ rights.

(2) The requirements of paragraph (1) shall not apply to community crisis homes that are certified and licensed prior to March 1, 2020, or prior to the adoption of the guidelines required in paragraph (1), whichever is sooner. However, these homes shall meet the requirements of paragraph (1) no later than 30 days following adoption of the guidelines.

(3) A community crisis home shall include in its facility program plan a description of how it will ensure physical restraint or
 containment will not be used as an extended procedure in accordance with this section, subdivision (h) of Section 1180.4 of the Health and Safety Code, and any other applicable law or regulation.

(e) The local regional center and each consumer’s regional center shall have joint responsibility for monitoring and evaluating the provision of services in the community crisis home. Monitoring shall include at least monthly face-to-face, onsite case management visits with each consumer by the consumer’s regional center and at least quarterly quality assurance visits by the vendoring regional center. The State Department of Developmental Services shall monitor and ensure the regional centers’ compliance with their monitoring responsibilities.

(f) A consumer’s regional center shall also notify the clients’ rights advocate of each community crisis home admission. Unless the consumer
 objects on the consumer’s own behalf, the clients’ rights advocate may participate in developing the plan to transition the consumer to the consumer’s prior residence or an alternative community-based residential setting with needed services and supports.

(g) The State Department of Developmental Services shall establish by regulation a rate methodology for community crisis homes that includes a fixed facility component for residential services and an individualized services and supports component based on each consumer’s needs as determined through the individual program plan process, which may include assistance with returning to the consumer’s prior living arrangement or transitioning to an alternative community residential setting, including, when appropriate for the individual, wraparound services through intensive individualized support services.

(h) If the State Department
 of Developmental Services determines that urgent action is necessary to protect a consumer residing in a community crisis home from physical or mental abuse, abandonment, or any other substantial threat to the consumer’s health and safety, the State Department of Developmental Services may request that the regional center or centers remove the consumer from the community crisis home or direct the regional center or centers to obtain alternative or additional services for the consumer within 24 hours of that determination. When possible, an individual program plan (IPP) meeting shall be convened to determine the appropriate action pursuant to this section. In any case, an IPP meeting shall be convened within 30 days following an action pursuant to this section. The regional center shall notify the clients’ rights advocate of any removal from the community crisis home.

(i) The
 State Department of Developmental Services shall rescind a community crisis home’s certificate of program approval when it determines that a community crisis home does not maintain substantial compliance with an applicable statute, regulation, or ordinance, or cannot ensure the health and safety of consumers. The decision of the State Department of Developmental Services shall be the final administrative decision. The
 State Department of Developmental Services shall transmit a decision rescinding a community crisis home’s certificate of program approval to the State Department of Social Services and the regional center with a recommendation as to whether to revoke the community crisis home license, and the State Department of Social Services shall revoke the license of the community crisis home pursuant to Section 1550 of the Health and Safety Code.

(j) The State Department of Developmental Services and regional centers shall provide to the State Department of Social Services all available documentation and evidentiary support necessary for the licensing and administration of community crisis homes and enforcement of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, and the applicable regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 253, Sec. 15.   (AB 175)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4698.1.

(a) A certificate of program approval shall not be issued pursuant to this article until the publication in Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations of emergency regulations filed by the State Department of Developmental Services. These regulations shall be developed in consultation with stakeholders, including the State Department of Social Services, consumer advocates, and regional centers. The regulations shall address at least all of the following:

(1) Program standards, including program design requirements, staffing structure, staff qualifications, and training. Training requirements shall include all of the following:

(A) A
 minimum of 16 hours of emergency intervention training, which shall include the techniques the facility will use to prevent injury and maintain safety regarding consumers who are a danger to self or others and shall emphasize positive behavioral supports and techniques that are alternatives to physical restraint.

(B) Additional training for direct care staff to address the specialized needs of the consumers, including training in emergency interventions.

(2) Requirements and timelines for the development and updating of each consumer’s individual program plan, including time-limited objectives and a plan to transition the consumer to his or her prior residence or an alternative community-based residential setting with needed services and supports. In developing these regulations, the department shall place a high priority on transitioning the consumer to his or her prior
 residence, when that is the preferred objective in the consumer’s individual program plan.

(3) Procedures and requirements for identifying and providing supplemental and ancillary staffing and supports, including therapeutic, behavioral, and clinical services and supports, based on individual consumer need.

(4) The rate methodology.

(5) Consumer rights and protections.

(b) The adoption, amendment, repeal, or readoption of a regulation authorized by this section is deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the State Department of Developmental Services is hereby exempted from the requirement that
 it describe specific facts showing the need for immediate action. These emergency regulations shall be developed in consultation with system stakeholders. A certificate of compliance for these implementing regulations shall be filed within 24 months following the adoption of the first emergency regulations filed pursuant to this section. The emergency regulations may be readopted and remain in effect until approval of the certificate of compliance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 30, Sec. 21.   (SB 856)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Oral Health for People with Disabilities Technical Assistance Center Program [4698.50. - 4698.53.]

4698.50.

(a) No later than July 1, 2027, the State Department of Developmental Services shall contract with a public or private California dental school or college to administer the Oral Health for People with Disabilities Technical Assistance Center Program. The department shall prioritize contracting with a public California dental school or college to administer the program. The purpose of the program is to improve dental care services for people with developmental and intellectual disabilities by reducing or eliminating the need for dental treatment using
 sedation and general anesthesia. The contract shall expire on June 30, 2032.

(b) The contracted California dental school or college may partner with a public or private dental school or college. If the contracted California dental school or college elects to partner with another dental school or college, the contracted California dental school or college shall prioritize partnering with a public California dental school or college. The contracted school or resulting partnership shall collectively meet both of the following qualifications:

(1) All partner public or private schools shall be located in California and be approved by the Dental Board of California or the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association.

(2) Lead faculty at one or more schools shall demonstrate having developed and implemented at regional centers, community-based dental care programs that have achieved all of the following:

(A) Successfully used teledentistry-supported systems to bring dental care to people with developmental disabilities in community settings.

(B) Successfully reduced the number of people needing dental care using sedation or
 general anesthesia.

(C) Demonstrated improved oral health in community settings as the result of meeting the achievements described in
 subparagraphs (A) and (B).

(c) In administering the Oral Health for People with Disabilities Technical Assistance Center Program, the contracted school or partnership shall do all of the following:

(1) Work with the department to engage up to 21 regional centers to participate in the program.

(2) Provide practical experience, systems development, and expertise in relevant subject areas.

(3) Enlist dental offices and clinics to participate and establish teams of
 community-based allied personnel and dentists to work with each participating regional center.

(4) Design, implement, and support customized operational systems in each community in conjunction with the local oral health community and regional center personnel.

(5) Provide initial and ongoing training, monitoring, and support for participating oral health personnel, including, but not limited to, dental offices and clinics, and dentists and allied dental personnel.

(6) Provide initial and ongoing training, monitoring, and support for participating regional center personnel.

(7) Monitor and support the ongoing improvement and sustainability of operational
 systems at each regional center.

(8) Organize and direct a statewide advisory committee and learning community.

(9) Collect and analyze program data with the support of participating regional centers and oral health providers.

(d) Beginning one year after the contract described in subdivision (a) commences and until June 30, 2033, the department shall submit to the Legislature an annual report of the data described in paragraph (9) of subdivision (c), in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(e) To implement this section, the department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the review or approval of the Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 612, Sec. 2.   (AB 341)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4698.51.

Participating regional centers shall do all of the following:

(a) Designate a lead person at each regional center with responsibility for duties related to this article.

(b) Establish vendor agreements with interested oral health professionals.

(c) Identify people with intellectual and developmental disabilities who can benefit from the program, especially those who are already experiencing long wait times for dental care using sedation or general anesthesia, or those who are likely to experience long wait times in the future.

(d) Collect and store social, medical, and consent history and information necessary for a referral to a participating oral health professional.

(e) Facilitate referrals to participating oral health professionals.

(f) Monitor program and individual patient activity and progress.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 612, Sec. 2.   (AB 341)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4698.52.

(a) The department shall do all of the following:

(1) Establish procedures for regional center directors, or their designees, to participate in the program.

(2) Provide guidance and establish protocols to support the program, including detailed clarification of payment for the various components of the program, workflow, and purchase-of-service authorizations and payments.

(3) Provide guidance for regional centers regarding the use of specialized therapeutic services payments.

(4) Provide guidance and technical assistance for regional centers to streamline the vendorization process for dental professionals.

(5) Allow regional centers to aggregate and publish anonymized results data.

(b) The department may consult and share information with other state entities as necessary to implement this article.

(c) The department may adopt other rules and regulations necessary to implement this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 612, Sec. 2.   (AB 341)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4698.53.

Implementation of this article is subject to an appropriation by the Legislature for the purpose of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 612, Sec. 2.   (AB 341)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.5. Developmental Services Workforce Stabilization [4699. - 4699.7.]

4699.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The State Department of Developmental Services estimates that about 120,000 direct support professionals and about 5,500 regional center service coordinators served approximately 370,000 consumers in fiscal year 2021–22.

(b) Workforce capacity among direct support professionals and regional center service coordinators is a growing concern in the developmental services system.

(c) Based on annual projected regional center caseload growth and assumptions about direct support professional turnover, the developmental services system is projected to need approximately 33,000 direct
 support professionals and 2,700 regional center service coordinators over the next five years.

(d) To be responsive to California’s changing demographics, the department should support regional centers and service providers in undertaking a purposeful approach to recruiting and hiring workers from diverse communities and explore technological advancements as a complement to workers who provide direct services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 28.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4699.1.

Implementation of this chapter shall be subject to an appropriation by the Legislature for the purpose of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 28.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4699.2.

(a) The department shall establish, and regional centers shall administer in coordination with service providers, a program to provide training stipends to direct support professionals.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to enhance the quality of services received by consumers, improve direct support professional retention, and increase interest among direct support professionals in skills development and continuous learning opportunities by offering stipends for the completion of training courses.

(c) A regional center shall provide up to two five-hundred-dollar ($500) training stipends to a direct support professional who completes training and development courses as
 specified by the department.

(d) Each training stipend shall be paid no later than three months after the conclusion of a training requirement.

(e) A portion of the program funding shall be used to compensate service providers an amount, in the form of a fee, as necessary to cover the reasonable costs to administer the program in coordination with regional centers, as determined by the department.

(f) Service providers and regional centers shall track participation and shall report to the department on a quarterly basis, commencing on January 31, 2023, on cumulative and reporting-period data about the number of participants, the administration of the fee pursuant to subdivision (e), the selection of training and development courses, and turnover information among participants.

(g) Training and development courses shall commence no later than November 1, 2022. A program participant may enroll in a training and development course on a later date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 28.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4699.3.

(a) The department shall establish, and regional centers shall administer, an entry-level training and internship program for individuals interested in becoming direct support professionals, subject to an appropriation by the Legislature.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to enhance the quality of services received by consumers and increase the hiring and retention of direct support professionals through the creation of a training and internship program that demonstrates the career opportunities available to individuals interested in becoming direct
 support professionals, while providing them with the skills that they need to deliver high-quality services to consumers.

(c) The training and internship program shall do all of the following:

(1) Contract with outside agencies for recruitment outreach.

(2) Offer three-month internships that provide entry-level training and practical work experience for participants.

(3) Outline the wage and employments costs for paid internships up to 30 hours per week, to collectively cover participant wages and service provider costs.

(4) Focus on populations that reflect the state’s diverse population and that do not traditionally have a pathway toward jobs in the developmental services field.

(5) Establish an entry point to the continuum of developmental services workforce development, including the training described in Section 4511.5.

(6) Create opportunities for postinternship permanent employment with service providers and allow for a five-hundred-dollar ($500) retention stipend after six months of continuous employment and another five-hundred-dollar ($500) stipend after one year of continuous employment.

(d) Regional centers shall track participation and report to the department on a quarterly basis on cumulative and reporting-period data about the number of participants, the number of participants hired, and the number of six-month and one-year employment stipends provided.

(e) Internships shall be available no later than June 1, 2023. A
 program participant may enroll in an internship on a later date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 47, Sec. 12.   (AB 162)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4699.4.

(a) The department shall establish, and regional centers shall administer, a tuition reimbursement program for regional center employees who seek a degree or certification in a health or human services-related field.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to enhance regional center services received by consumers, increase subject matter expertise and career advancement options at regional centers, and improve employee retention rates at regional centers by offering tuition reimbursement for eligible regional center employees.

(c) Each qualifying participant shall be eligible to receive up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) annually for up to three years.

(d) In exchange for tuition reimbursement, participants shall be required to work at the regional center for no less than one year for each year of tuition reimbursement following completion of their degree or certification. An employee may transfer to another regional center to complete this requirement. The funding regional center shall notify the department within 30 days after a request from an employee to transfer to another regional center to complete this requirement. The receiving regional center is responsible for reporting the information required in subdivision (g).

(e) By September 1, 2022, the department shall publish eligibility requirements for regional center staff participation. These requirements shall include information about which regional center staff are eligible, which academic programs or types of academic programs are eligible, minimum application
 requirements, concurrent regional center work requirements, and postgraduation regional center work requirements. In addition, the department shall describe the terms of the program, including repayment or partial repayment requirements for individuals who do not complete their degree or certification or do not complete the concurrent or postgraduation work requirements.

(f) Tuition reimbursement shall be available for the 2022–23 through 2024–25 fiscal years.

(g) Regional centers shall report to the department on an annual basis, commencing on April 1, 2023, and thereafter on January 1 of each year until January 1, 2026, on data about the program, including number and demographics of applicants and participants and their regional center position, degree and field sought, and how long they were employed by the regional center after completing their degree or
 certification.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 28.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4699.5.

(a) The department shall seek input from stakeholders throughout the implementation of this chapter.

(b) Stakeholders may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Consumers and families across different geographic regions of the state and from diverse racial and ethnic backgrounds, and diverse consumer age groups and disabilities.

(2) Regional center representatives, including executive-level staff, administrative staff, and service coordinators.

(3) Service providers representing a diverse range of service types and models and
 including executive staff and direct support professionals.

(c) The department may utilize one of its existing stakeholder groups if it meets the criteria described in this section to conduct this consultation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 49, Sec. 28.   (SB 188)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4699.6.

(a) The department shall report to the Legislature at quarterly briefings for legislative staff about the progress on the programs described in this chapter. Reporting shall include summaries of the relevant data collected by service providers and regional centers.

(b) The department shall submit a report to the Legislature, in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, no later than January 10, 2026, evaluating the success of the programs described in this chapter. As applicable, the report shall include, but not be limited to, information about all of the following:

(1) Summary information about each program, including statistics on participation and program